Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB304.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 247.552 is amended to read as follows:
No assessment levied by any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS 247.510
to 247.595 shall exceed the rate of one-half[one-fourth] of one percent (0.5%)[(0.25%)]
of the net market price per bushel on all soybeans marketed within the Commonwealth.
The assessment shall be deducted from the amount paid the producer at the first point of
sale.
Page 1 of 1
BR147100.100 - 1471 - XXXX 2/21/2025 10:28 AM Jacketed